Vermont, session 2025-2026, H827.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 27 V.S.A. § 380 is amended to read:
§ 380. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION; CONVEYANCE OF REAL
ESTATE
(a) Prior to or as part of a contract for the conveyance of real property, the
seller shall provide the buyer with the following information:
(1) [Repealed.]
(2) [Repealed.]
VT LEG #385185 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.827
2026 Page 2 of 3
(3) a physical or electronic copy or a digital link of the official flood
insurance rate map, as published by the Federal Emergency Management
Agency, or notice that a flood insurance rate map is unavailable effective for
the community in which the real property is located;
(4) whether the real property was subject to flooding or flood damage
while the seller possessed the property, including flood damage from
inundation or from flood-related erosion or landslide damage; and
(5) whether the seller maintains or is required by federal or State law to
maintain flood insurance on the real property.
* * *
(f)(1) If a seller of real property has never physically resided on the real
property subject to a contract for conveyance, the seller may satisfy the
requirement of subdivision (a)(4) of this section by notifying the buyer in
writing that the seller has not physically resided on the property and therefore
cannot affirm whether the property was subject to flooding or flood damage
while the seller possessed the property.
(2) This subsection shall not relieve a seller from the disclosure
requirements of subdivision (a)(4) of this section when the seller has
knowledge that the property was subject to flooding or flood damage while the
seller possessed the property, including flood damage from inundation or from
flood-related erosion or landslide damage.
VT LEG #385185 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.827
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385185 v.1